Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.210

Recanvass—Generally.

Whenever the canvassing board finds during the initial counting process, or during any subsequent recount thereof, that there is an apparent discrepancy or an inconsistency in the returns of a primary or election, or that election staff has made an error regarding the treatment or disposition of a ballot, the board may recanvass the ballots or voting devices in any precincts of the county. The canvassing board shall conduct any necessary recanvass activity on or before the last day to certify or recertify the results of the primary, election, or subsequent recount and correct any error and document the correction of any error that it finds.

[ 2005 c 243 s 17; 2003 c 111 s 1521; 1990 c 59 s 64; 1965 c 9 s 29.62.050. Prior: 1951 c 193 s 1; 1917 c 7 s 1, part; 1913 c 58 s 15, part; RRS s 5315, part. Formerly RCW 29.62.050.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Voting systems: Chapter 29A.12 RCW.